tr_test.dic
çıkarmak/ђ
bakakalmak/ђ
almak/ђ
marazlanmak/ђ
mayalanmak/ђ
çağmak/ђ
katmak/ђ
kırışmak/ђ
kalkmak/ђ
fışkırmak/ђ
başarmak/ђ
ırganmak/ђ
sıkışmak/ђ
kıvrımlanmak/ђ
kostaklanmak/ђ
mızıldanmak/ђ
kalkışmak/ђ
çıkartmak/ђ
sıyrılmak/ђ
kapaklanmak/ђ
uğraşmak/ђ
çığalanmak/ђ
yağmak/ђ
anlatmak/ђ
alçaltmak/ђ
dayanışmak/ђ
ıslıklatmak/ђ
karıkmak/ђ
kakmak/ђ
sapıtmak/ђ
yırtınmak/ђ
dağıtmak/ђ
çaktırmak/ђ
atıştırmak/ђ
uzaklanmak/ђ
kanırmak/ђ
canlanmak/ђ
cıvıldaşmak/ђ
bolarmak/ђ
baymak/ђ
kımlanmak/ђ
kılmak/ђ
kalmak/ђ
ayrılmak/ђ
yandırmak/ђ
kısmak/ђ
vıcırdaşmak/ђ
kaşarlanmak/ђ
nasırlanmak/ђ
şaşırmak/ђ
sırnaşmak/ђ
kapılmak/ђ
kurtlanmak/ђ
paslanmak/ђ
baylanmak/ђ
mallanmak/ђ
hapşırmak/ђ
yazmak/ђ
ayaklanmak/ђ
sokranmak/ђ
yapınmak/ђ
nurlanmak/ђ
somurdanmak/ђ
uyarmak/ђ
aksatmak/ђ
barınmak/ђ
yarmak/ђ
sıtmalanmak/ђ
aylanmak/ђ
sağalmak/ђ
çıkışmak/ђ
tartmak/ђ
ayartmak/ђ
huylanmak/ђ
konuşlanmak/ђ
ıslanmak/ђ
çapaklanmak/ђ
sulanmak/ђ
acındırmak/ђ
katılmak/ђ
kırınmak/ђ
akışmak/ђ
atandırmak/ђ
cavmak/ђ
karakmak/ђ
kıpraşmak/ђ
olağandışılaşmak/ђ
saçıştırmak/ђ
tapışmak/ђ
çarklatmak/ђ
abanozlaştırmak/ђ
acık/ђ
acınılmak/ђ
adlaştırmak/ђ
afyonlanmak/ђ
aklaşmak/ђ
aktartmak/ђ
akıtılmak/ђ
alafrangalaştırmak/ђ
aldırılmak/ђ
allanmak/ђ
alçılanmak/ђ
alışıldık/ђ
amerikalılaşmak/ђ
anlamsızlaşmak/ђ
ansınmak/ђ
anımsatmak/ђ
aptallaşmak/ђ
aranılmak/ђ
araştırtmak/ђ
arsızlaştırmak/ђ
arıklatmak/ђ
arıtılmak/ђ
astırmak/ђ
attırmak/ђ
avurtlanmak/ђ
ayazlandırmak/ђ
aynılaşmak/ђ
ayrımsanmak/ђ
ayılaşmak/ђ
azalttırmak/ђ
azmanlaşmak/ђ
açkılatılmak/ђ
açıklaştırmak/ђ
ağaçlandırmak/ђ
ağlatmak/ђ
ağırlatmak/ђ
aşağılaşmak/ђ
aşındırılmak/ђ
baharatlandırmak/ђ
balabanlaşmak/ђ
balçıklaşmak/ђ
barındırmak/ђ
bastırılmak/ђ
batırtmak/ђ
bayraklaştırılmak/ђ
bağdaştırmak/ђ
bağlattırmak/ђ
bağımlaşmak/ђ
bağıtlaşmak/ђ
başarılmak/ђ
başlatılmak/ђ
beyazlatılmak/ђ
bocalatmak/ђ
bollaştırmak/ђ
borçlanılmak/ђ
boynuzlanmak/ђ
bozartmak/ђ
boğumlanmak/ђ
boşlatmak/ђ
budatmak/ђ
bulanıklaşmak/ђ
bulgulanmak/ђ
burgaçlanmak/ђ
buzağılaşmak/ђ
bıktırılmak/ђ
bıçkınlaşmak/ђ
canavarlaşmak/ђ
cilalanmak/ђ
cıvıklaştırılmak/ђ
dalkavuklaşmak/ђ
dargınlaşmak/ђ
dayattırmak/ђ
destanlaşmak/ђ
dolandırılmak/ђ
donuklaşmak/ђ
doğululaştırmak/ђ
durmaksızın/ђ
düzyazılaşmak/ђ
fakslatmak/ђ
ferahlatmak/ђ
frapanlaşmak/ђ
fışkırtılmak/ђ
gruplandırılmak/ђ
halkalanmak/ђ
harmanlatmak/ђ
hayvanlaşmak/ђ
hoplatılmak/ђ
hülyalaşmak/ђ
hışıldatmak/ђ
imzalattırmak/ђ
itibarsızlaşmak/ђ
kadrolaşmak/ђ
kalaylatmak/ђ
kalıplaştırmak/ђ
kancalanmak/ђ
kaplanmak/ђ
kararlaştırılmak/ђ
karışılmak/ђ
katranlatmak/ђ
kavratmak/ђ
kazanılmak/ђ
kaşağılanmak/ђ
klorlanmak/ђ
kolalatmak/ђ
koparttırmak/ђ
koyulaştırılmak/ђ
kundaklanmak/ђ
kurumsallaşmak/ђ
kuzulaşmak/ђ
kılıbıklaşmak/ђ
kırbaçlatılmak/ђ
kırılmak/ђ
kıtlaşmak/ђ
kıydırmak/ђ
loşlaşmak/ђ
mandallanmak/ђ
maçolaşmak/ђ
modalaşmak/ђ
mutlandırmak/ђ
mızmızlaşmak/ђ
nurlandırmak/ђ
olayazmak/ђ
onartmak/ђ
ormansızlaştırmak/ђ
oylatmak/ђ
pahalılaşmak/ђ
parlaklaşmak/ђ
patırdatmak/ђ
pofurdatmak/ђ
pudralatmak/ђ
pırıldatmak/ђ
rastlaştırmak/ђ
sabahlatılmak/ђ
sakatlatılmak/ђ
saldırılmak/ђ
salındırtılmak/ђ
sapıklaştırmak/ђ
sarstırmak/ђ
savaştırılmak/ђ
saygınlaştırmak/ђ
saçtırmak/ђ
sağman/ђ
silahlandırılmak/ђ
sloganlaştırmak/ђ
somutlandırılmak/ђ
sorgulanmak/ђ
soysuzlaştırılmak/ђ
sulandırmak/ђ
sıfatlaştırmak/ђ
sıkıntılanmak/ђ
sınıflaştırmak/ђ
sıralandırılmak/ђ
sıvazlanmak/ђ
sızlatılmak/ђ
sığın/ђ
takozlanmak/ђ
tanıklanmak/ђ
tapalatmak/ђ
tartıl/ђ
tatsızlaşmak/ђ
tekrarlanmak/ђ
tokatlatmak/ђ
toplatmak/ђ
tornalatmak/ђ
tutkallatmak/ђ
tıklatılmak/ђ
tıpışlanmak/ђ
ucuzlatmak/ђ
uluslaştırmak/ђ
utandırılmak/ђ
uygarlaştırmak/ђ
uzanılmak/ђ
varaklanmak/ђ
vurgulatmak/ђ
yakınlaşmak/ђ
yalpalanmak/ђ
yankılatmak/ђ
yaptırmak/ђ
yararlandırılmak/ђ
yasalaşmak/ђ
yatırman/ђ
yaygınlaştırmak/ђ
yağlanmak/ђ
yoklanmak/ђ
yozlaşmak/ђ
yumurtlatmak/ђ
yıktırmak/ђ
zamklanmak/ђ
zımbalanmak/ђ
çakmaklaşmak/ђ
çalıştıran/ђ
çapraşıklaşmak/ђ
çatallaştırmak/ђ
çağcıllaşmak/ђ
çopurlaştırmak/ђ
çuvallatmak/ђ
çıplaklaşmak/ђ
ılıklaşmak/ђ
ırgalatmak/ђ
ışıklandırmak/ђ
şangırdatmak/ђ
şaşılmak/ђ
şıklaştırmak/ђ
kargolanmak/ђ
